ja: 矢コンポーネントタイプ: アローラップ; ブッシング; カラー; ハーフアウト; インサート; アウトサート; ピンインサート; スリーブ; ユニブッシング; その他
sv: Pilkomponenttyp: Pilwrap; Bussning; Krage; Half-out; Insats; Outsert; Pin-insats; Hylsa; Uni-bussning; Annat
lt-LT: Strėlės komponento tipas: Strėlės plėvelė; Įvorė; Žiedas; Pusinė įvorė; Įdėklas; Išorinis įdėklas; Smeigtuko įdėklas; Mova; Universali įvorė; Kita
pl: Typ elementu strzały: Owijka na strzałę; Tuleja; Kołnierz (collar); Insert typu half-out; Insert; Outsert; Insert z pinem; Tuleja; UNI-bushing; Inne
nb: Pilkomponenttype: Pil-wrap; Bøssing; Krage; Half-out; Insert; Outsert; Pin-innsats; Hylse; Uni-bøssing; Annet
en: Arrow component type: Arrow wrap; Bushing; Collar; Half-out; Insert; Outsert; Pin insert; Sleeve; Uni-bushing; Other
da: Pilkomponenttype: Pile-wrap; Bøsning; Krave; Half-out; Indsats; Outsert; Pin-indsats; Muffe; Uni-bøsning; Andet
sk-SK: Typ komponentu šípu: Fólia na šíp; Puzdro; Krúžok; Half-out insert; Vložka; Outsert vložka; Pinová vložka; Návlek; Uni-bushing; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de componentă a săgeții: Folie pentru săgeată; Bucșă; Guler; Inserție half-out; Inserție; Outsert; Inserție pentru pin; Manșon; Uni-bucșă; Altele
vi: Loại linh kiện mũi tên: Bọc thân mũi tên; Ống lót; Vòng đệm; Đầu chèn nửa ngoài; Đầu chèn; Đầu chèn ngoài; Đầu chèn chốt; Ống bọc; Ống lót Uni; Khác
nl: Pijlonderdeel type: Pijlwrap; Bushing; Kraag; Half-out; Insert; Outsert; Pin-insert; Huls; Uni-bushing; Overige
de: Pfeilkomponententyp: Pfeil-Wrap; Bushing; Collar; Half-Out; Insert; Outsert; Pin-Insert; Sleeve; UNI-Bushing; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de componente de seta: Envoltório de flecha; Casquilho; Colar; Half-out; Inserto; Outsert; Inserto de pino; Manga; Casquilho universal; Outros
fr: Type de composant de flèche: Film adhésif pour flèche; Bushing; Collier; Half-out; Insert; Outsert; Insert à goupille; Manchon; Uni-bushing; Autre
bg-BG: Тип компонент със стрела: Фолио за стрела; Втулка; Пръстен; Полувложка; Вложка; Външна вложка; Щифтова вложка; Ръкав; Универсална втулка; Друго
zh-CN: 箭矢组件类型: 箭贴; 轴套; 防爆环; 半外接座; 内接座; 外接座; 销钉内接座; 套管; 通用护尾套; 其他
zh-TW: 弓箭組件類型: 箭桿貼紙; 襯套; 護環; 半外插式; 內插式; 外插式; 銷式內插; 套管; 通用襯套; 其他
ru: Тип компонента стрелы: Оклейка для стрел; Втулка; Защитное кольцо; Удлиненный инсерт (Half-out); Инсерт; Аутсерт; Пин-инсерт; Муфта; Универсальная втулка (Uni-bushing); Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta sestavnega dela puščice: Ovoj za puščico; Puša; Obroček; Polovični vstavek (half-out); Vstavek; Zunanji vstavek (outsert); Vstavek za zatič; Tuljavec; Puša Uni; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta komponente za strijelu: Naljepnica za strelicu; Umetak (bushing); Prsten za strelicu; Polu-umetak; Umetak; Vanjski umetak (outsert); Pin umetak; Navlaka; Uni-umetak; Ostalo
it: Tipo di componente freccia: Wrap per frecce; Boccola; Collare; Half-out; Inserto; Outsert; Inserto pin; Manicotto; Uni-bushing; Altro
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนลูกธนู: แผ่นพันก้านลูกธนู; บูช; ปลอกหุ้ม; แบบ Half-out; อินเสิร์ท; เอาท์เสิร์ท; อินเสิร์ทแบบพิน; ปลอก; ยูนิบูช; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de componente da flecha: Wrap para flecha; Bucha; Colarinho; Half-out; Insert; Outsert; Insert tipo pino; Luva; Uni-bushing; Outro
tr: Ok bileşeni türü: Ok kaplaması; Burç; Bilezik; Yarı dış eklenti; İç eklenti; Dış eklenti; Pimli eklenti; Manşon; Uni burç; Diğer
fi: Nuolen osan tyyppi: Nuoliteippi; Holkki; Kaulus; Half-out-holkki; Insertti; Outsertti; Pin-insertti; Hiha; Uni-holkki; Muu
es: Tipo de componente de flecha: Envoltura para flecha; Buje; Collarín; Medio inserto; Inserto; Inserto exterior; Inserto de pin; Funda protectora; Buje uni; Otro
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος βέλους: Μεμβράνη βέλους; Δακτύλιος; Κολάρο; Ένθετο half-out; Ένθετο; Προέκταμα (outsert); Ένθετο pin; Χιτώνιο; Δακτύλιος uni-bushing; Άλλο
ko: 화살 부품 유형: 화살 랩; 부싱; 칼라; 하프 아웃; 인서트; 아웃서트; 핀 인서트; 슬리브; 유니 부싱; 기타
cs: Typ součásti šípu: Fólie na šíp; Pouzdro; Kroužek; Half-out vložka; Insert; Outsert; Pinový insert; Návlek; Uni-bushing; Ostatní
hu: Nyíl alkotóelemének típusa: Nyílvessző-fólia; Persely; Gallér; Half-out betét; Betét; Outsert; Tűs betét; Hüvely; Uni-persely; Egyéb